src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-sieqss_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - sieʹss: # Noun 1e-stem 'father's sister/isän sisko' - full paradigm
# 
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Nom: sieʹss
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Gen: sieʹzz
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Acc: sieʹzz
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Ill: seâsˈsa
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Loc: sieʹzzest
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Com: siõʹzzin
     sieʹss+N+Ess: sieʹssen
     sieʹss+N+Par: sieʹssed
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Abe: [sieʹzztaa, sieʹzztää]
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Nom: sieʹzz
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Gen: siõʹzzi
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Acc: siõʹzzid
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Ill: siõʹzzid
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Loc: siõʹzzin
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Com: siõʹzzivuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Abe: [siõʹzzitaa, siõʹzzitää]

##
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: seâssam
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: seâssad
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: sieʹsses
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: sieʹssem
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: sieʹssed
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: sieʹssez
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: seâssan
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: seâzzad
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: sieʹzzes
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: sieʹssen
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: sieʹzzed
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: sieʹzzez
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: seâssan
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: seâzzad
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: sieʹzzes
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: sieʹssen
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: sieʹzzed
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: sieʹzzez
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: seâsˈsʼsan
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: seâsˈsʼsad
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: seâsˈsʼses
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: seâsˈsʼseen
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: seâsˈsʼseed
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: seâsˈsʼseez
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: sieˈʹzstan
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: sieˈʹzstad
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: sieˈʹzstes
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: sieˈʹzsteen
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: sieˈʹzsteed
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: sieˈʹzsteez
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: siõʹzzinan
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: siõʹzzinad
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: siõʹzzines
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: siõʹzzineen
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: siõʹzzineed
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: siõʹzzineez
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: seâssantää
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: seâzzadtää
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: sieʹzzestää
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: sieʹssentää
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: sieʹzzedtää
     sieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: sieʹzzeztää
     sieʹss+N+Ess+PxSg1: sieʹsˈsnan
     sieʹss+N+Ess+PxSg2: sieʹsˈsnad
     sieʹss+N+Ess+PxSg3: sieʹsˈsnes
     sieʹss+N+Ess+PxPl1: sieʹsˈsneen
     sieʹss+N+Ess+PxPl2: sieʹsˈsneed
     sieʹss+N+Ess+PxPl3: sieʹsˈsneez
#
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: seâssan
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: seâzzad
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: sieʹzzes
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: sieʹssen
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: sieʹzzed
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: sieʹzzez
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: siõʹzzään
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: siõʹzzääd
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: siõʹzzees
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: siõʹzzeen
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: siõʹzzeed
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: siõʹzzeez
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: siõʹzzään
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: siõʹzzääd
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: siõʹzzees
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: siõʹzzeen
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: siõʹzzeed
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: siõʹzzeez
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: siõʹzzään
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: siõʹzzääd
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: siõʹzzees
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: siõʹzzeen
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: siõʹzzeed
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: siõʹzzeez
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: siõʹzzinan
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: siõʹzzinad
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: siõʹzzines
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: siõʹzzineen
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: siõʹzzineed
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: siõʹzzineez
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: siõʹzzäänvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: siõʹzzäädvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: siõʹzzeesvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: siõʹzzeenvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: siõʹzzeedvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: siõʹzzeezvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: siõʹzzääntää
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: siõʹzzäädtää
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: siõʹzzeestää
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: siõʹzzeentää
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: siõʹzzeedtää
     sieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: siõʹzzeeztää
#
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: seâzzaž
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: seâzza
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: seâzza
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: seâzzʼže
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: seâzzast
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: seâzzain
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [seâzzataa, seâzzatää]
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: seâzzʼžen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: seâzzʼžed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: seâzza
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: seâzzai
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: seâzzaid
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: seâzzaid
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: seâzzain
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: seâzzaivuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [seâzzaitaa, seâzzaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: seâzzʼžam
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: seâzzʼžad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: seâzzʼžes
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: seâzzʼžeem
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: seâzzʼžeed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: seâzzʼžeez
     
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: seâzzʼžan
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: seâzzʼžad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: seâzzʼžes
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: seâzzʼžeen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: seâzzʼžeed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: seâzzʼžeez
     
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: seâzzʼžan
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: seâzzʼžad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: seâzzʼžes
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: seâzzʼžeen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: seâzzʼžeed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: seâzzʼžeez

     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: seâzzʼžasan
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: seâzzʼžasad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: seâzzʼžasas
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: seâzzʼžeʹsen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: seâzzʼžeʹsed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: seâzzʼžeʹsez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: seâˈzstan
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: seâˈzstad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: seâˈzstes
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: seâˈzsteen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: seâˈzsteed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: seâˈzsteez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: seâzzainan
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: seâzzainad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: seâzzaines
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: seâzzaineen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: seâzzaineed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: seâzzaineez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: seâzzʼžantää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: seâzzʼžadtää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: seâzzʼžestää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: seâzzʼžeentää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: seâzzʼžeedtää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: seâzzʼžeeztää

#     
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: seâzzʼžan
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: seâzzʼžad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: seâzzʼžes
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: seâzzʼžeen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: seâzzʼžeed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: seâzzʼžeez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: seâzzään
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: seâzzääd
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: seâzzees
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: seâzzeen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: seâzzeed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: seâzzeez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: seâzzään
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: seâzzääd
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: seâzzees
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: seâzzeen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: seâzzeed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: seâzzeez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: seâzzään
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: seâzzääd
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: seâzzees
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: seâzzeen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: seâzzeed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: seâzzeez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: seâzzainan
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: seâzzainad
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: seâzzaines
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: seâzzaineen
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: seâzzaineed
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: seâzzaineez
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: seâzzäänvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: seâzzäädvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: seâzzeesvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: seâzzeenvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: seâzzeedvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: seâzzeezvuiʹm
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: seâzzääntää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: seâzzäädtää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: seâzzeestää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: seâzzeentää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: seâzzeedtää
     sieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: seâzzeeztää
